Massachusetts, session 194th, H4124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 172. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary,
a correctional facility shall not prohibit an inmate from playing or participating in roll-playing
games, including but not limited to Dungeons & Dragons and similar games, during any
regularly-allotted period of leisure or recreation afforded to the inmate.
(b) A correctional facility may adopt written policies to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 90 days after passage.
of 1